Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3514.01
Deliberate misconduct; intentional misinformation; prohibited.

(1) Any licensee, registrant, applicant for a license or registration, employee of a licensee or registrant, contractor or subcontractor of a licensee, registrant, or applicant for a license or registration, or employee of any contractor or subcontractor of a licensee, registrant, or applicant for a license or registration, who knowingly provides to any licensee, registrant, applicant, contractor, or subcontractor any components, equipment, materials, or other goods or services that relate to a licensee's, registrant's, or applicant's activities covered by the Radiation Control Act, shall not (a) engage in deliberate misconduct that causes or would have caused, if not detected, a licensee, registrant, or applicant to be in violation of any rule, regulation, or order or any term, condition, or limitation of any license or registration issued by the department or (b) intentionally submit to the department, a licensee, a registrant, an applicant, or a licensee's, registrant's, or applicant's contractor or subcontractor, information that the person submitting the information knows to be incomplete or inaccurate in some respect material to the department.

(2) Any person who violates this section is subject to section 71-3517.

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 74.